Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-233
Trust company; substituted as fiduciary; accounting; transfer of assets.

A bank shall account jointly with the trust company which has been substituted as fiduciary for the bank pursuant to sections 8-230 to 8-233 for the accounting period during which the trust company is initially so substituted. Upon substitution pursuant to sections 8-230 to 8-233, the bank shall deliver to the trust company all assets held by the bank as fiduciary, except assets held for accounts with respect to which there has been no substitution pursuant to sections 8-230 to 8-233, and upon substitution all the assets shall become the property of the trust company without the necessity of any instrument of transfer or conveyance.

Laws 1977, LB 338, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 52.